Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-416
Legislative Research Office; Director of Research; powers and duties.

(1) The Legislative Research Office is established within the Legislative Council. The office shall provide nonpartisan public policy and legal research for members of the Legislature and their staffs and maintain a legislative reference library for the use of members of the Legislature and their staffs. The Director of Research shall be responsible for hiring, firing, and supervising the research office staff.

(2) At the request of the Director of Research, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council may issue subpoenas as provided in subsection (2) of section 50-406 for information related to a research request from the Legislative Research Office pursuant to this section.

Laws 2009, LB620, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 79.